District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1205.03

Establishment of Board of Governors and School of Law.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title V, § 503
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7241
Sept. 12, 1987, D.C. Law 7-22, § 2, 34 DCR 4199
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-51, § 2, 34 DCR 6889
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 22(a), (b), 35 DCR 147
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-74, § 2(c), 36 DCR 8117
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 301(h), 43 DCR 2978

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1543.

Prior Codifications

For temporary repeal of §§ 31-1542 through 31-1548 1981 Ed., see § 301(g) through (m) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-264, April 26, 1996, 43 DCR 2412), and § 201(g)-(m) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-335, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4256).

Emergency Legislation